Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 34 Replevin

§§ 1-34-101 through 1-34-118.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1987, ch. 198, § 3.

Revision of chapter. —

Laws 1987, ch. 198, § 3, revised this chapter by repealing and recreating former §§

1-15-101

through

1-15-407

and

1-34-101

through 1-34-118 as present §§

1-15-101

through

1-15-425

.

No detailed explanation of the changes made by Laws 1987, ch. 198, has been attempted. For tables of revised and renumbered sections, see Volume 11 of the Wyoming Statutes Annotated.